Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.660

Liability of school districts under contracts with youth programs.

(1) A school district shall not be liable for an injury to or the death of a person due to action or inaction of persons employed by, or under contract with, a youth program if:

(a) The action or inaction takes place on school property and during the delivery of services of the youth program;

(b) The private nonprofit group provides proof of being insured, under an accident and liability policy issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state, that covers any injury or damage arising from delivery of its services. Coverage for a policy meeting the requirements of this section must be at least fifty thousand dollars due to bodily injury or death of one person, or at least one hundred thousand dollars due to bodily injury or death of two or more persons in any incident. The private nonprofit shall also provide a statement of compliance with the policies for the management of concussion and head injury in youth sports as set forth in RCW 28A.600.190 and a statement of compliance with the policies for sudden cardiac arrest awareness as set forth in RCW 28A.600.195; and

(c) The group provides proof of such insurance before the first use of the school facilities. The immunity granted shall last only as long as the insurance remains in effect.

(2) Immunity under this section does not apply to any school district before January 1, 2000.

(3) As used in this section, "youth programs" means any program or service, offered by a private nonprofit group, that is operated primarily to provide persons under the age of eighteen with opportunities to participate in services or programs.

(4) This section does not impair or change the ability of any person to recover damages for harm done by: (a) Any contractor or employee of a school district acting in his or her capacity as a contractor or employee; or (b) the existence of unsafe facilities or structures or programs of any school district.

[ 2015 c 26 s 2; 2009 c 475 s 1; 1999 c 316 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2015 c 26: See notes following RCW 28A.600.195.

Intent—Effective date—1999 c 316: See notes following RCW 28A.335.155.